District of Columbia statutes.
47-3109

Repealed

Annual license fee.

Repealed.

Oct. 4, 1978, D.C. Law 2-114, § 10, 25 DCR 1985
Dec. 21, 1979, D.C. Law 3-41, § 2(c), 26 DCR 2078
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
July 18, 2000, D.C. Law 13-140, § 28, 47 DCR 3431
1973 Ed., § 47-3209.
1981 Ed., § 47-3109.